Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-105 Penalty. There shall
be a fine of not more than $1,000 or imprisonment of not more than one year, or
both, for:

(1) Any person who is found in the State as officer,
member, principal, agent, or in any other capacity, soliciting or conducting or
operating the business of a mutual benefit society, as defined in section
432:1-104, not qualified and licensed to operate the business in conformity
with this article, or

(2) Any trustee, officer, or other person in charge
of the affairs of any such society, who authorizes, sanctions, or permits the
issuance of any certificate, policy, or contract, for the payment of
benefits in violation of this article, or

(3) Any person who violates any other provision of
this article relating to mutual benefit societies. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am
L 2002, c 155, §103]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next